Utah statutes.
53-5-706.   Permit -- Fingerprints transmitted to bureau -- Report from bureau.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), the fingerprints of each applicant shall be taken on a form prescribed by the bureau.

(b)  Upon receipt of the fingerprints and the fee prescribed in Section 53-5-707, the bureau shall conduct a search of its files for criminal history information pertaining to the applicant, and shall request the Federal Bureau of Investigation to conduct a similar search through its files.

(c)  If the fingerprints are insufficient for the Federal Bureau of Investigation to conduct a search of its files for criminal history information, the application or concealed firearm permit may be denied, suspended, or revoked until sufficient fingerprints are submitted by the applicant.

(2) (a)  If the permit applicant has previously applied to the bureau for a permit to carry concealed firearms, the bureau shall note the previous identification numbers and other data which would provide positive identification in the files of the bureau on the copy of any subsequent permit submitted to the bureau in accordance with this section.

(b)  No additional application form, fingerprints, or fee are required under this Subsection (2).



Amended by Chapter 368, 2011 General Session

